src/fst/morphology/compounding.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Lule Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! Compounding
! ===========

LEXICON R
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ Rreal ; ! Flags to control compounding


LEXICON RNum
      +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:∑-∑# Noun ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num


LEXICON Rreal          ! lexicalising the 3-part compounds, with the tag ShCmp
           RrealTags   ; ! Business as usual: Normal compounds right on to Rreal
 +Cmp#:∑# MiddleNouns ; ! These nouns should not return to themselves, to avoid -jotjotjot-
                       ! They thus point directly to Rreal.

! This is for regular compounding. All entries NOT requiring a hyphen should point to this:
LEXICON RrealTags
                                         +Cmp#:∑#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
                          @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@∑# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
                          @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@∑# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation
                +Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:∑-                 Noun       ; ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@∑-  Verb       ; ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@∑-  Adjective  ; ! are allowed.

                              +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                HyphNouns  ; ! Go to words requiring hyphens, "lomme-cd-spelar"
                              +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                Acronym    ; ! maanaj-tv
                              +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                Numeral    ; ! maana-123
                              +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for non-hyph.
                                                                  ! words. viessu-London goes through here.
          +Cmp/SplitR+Cmp+Use/SpellNoSugg:∑-                 ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept


LEXICON RHyph
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RHyphTags ; ! Flags to control compounding

! This is for compounding with hyphen. All entries REQUIRING a hyphen should point to this:
LEXICON RHyphTags ! Recursive lexicon from all classes REQUIRING a hyphen to follow.
                  ! NBNBNB!!! The hyphen should be added here! NOT in the other lexicons!

                     +Cmp/OblHyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
      @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/OblHyph+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@∑-∑# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
      @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/OblHyph+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@∑-∑# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation

                     +Cmp/OblHyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                HyphNouns  ; ! Go to words requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-
                     +Cmp/OblHyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
!                    +Cmp/OblHyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                Numeral    ; ! maana-123 !SNM 11.5.2023: fører til massiv overgenerering. Må testast.
                     +Cmp/OblHyph+Cmp#:∑-∑#                ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.
                                                                ! London-Hull is covered here, whereas Hull-viessu
                                                                ! is covered by RHyph + Noun.
  +Cmp/SplitR+Cmp+Use/SpellNoSugg:∑-                 ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept

! Proper noun compounds without hyphens are NOT presently covered - if they were
! to be added, they need to be marked +Err/Orth. Examples: LondonHull & viessuLondon.
